Hawaii statutes.
[§657D-63] Reinstatement of health
insurance coverage upon release from service. (a) A person who, by reason
of service in the state military forces is entitled to the rights and benefits
of this chapter, shall be entitled upon release from such military service to
reinstatement of any health insurance which was:

(1) In effect on the day before service commenced;
and

(2) Terminated effective on a date during the period
of service.

(b) An exclusion or a waiting period may not
be imposed in connection with reinstatement of health insurance coverage for a
health or physical condition of a person under subsection (a), or a health or
physical condition for any other person who is covered by the insurance by
reason of the coverage of such person, if:

(1) The condition arose before or during that
person's period of training or service in the state military forces;

(2) An exclusion or waiting period would not have
been imposed for the condition during a period of coverage [or] participation
by such person in the insurance; and

(3) The condition of such person has not been
determined by the adjutant general to be a disability incurred or aggravated in
the line of duty, within the meaning of [title] 38 United States Code section
105.

(c) Subsection (a) does not apply in the case
of employer-offered insurance benefits in which a person referred to in such
subsection is entitled to participate pursuant to [title] 38 United States Code
section 2021 et seq. [L 1994, c 257, pt of §2]

Revision Note

Subsection (a) designation added pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next